Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.021

Opioid overdose reversal medication and training.

The department shall provide opioid overdose reversal medication and training in the use of such medication to all department staff whose job duties require in-person service or case management for child welfare or juvenile rehabilitation clients.

[ 2023 sp.s. c 1 s 21.]